California statutes. Civil Code
(3) Accept the borrower’s revised request for forbearance before the 21-day period described in paragraph (2) lapses.

(4) Respond to the borrower’s revised request within five business days of receipt of the revised request.

(f) The forbearance period required by subdivision (b) shall include any period of forbearance related to
 the wildfire disaster that a mortgage servicer has provided to a borrower before the effective date of this title.

(g) During the period of forbearance required by this section, no late fees shall be assessed to the borrower’s account and the borrower shall not be charged a default rate of interest.

(h) No later than 30 calendar days before the end of an initial forbearance period, a mortgage servicer shall provide written notice to the borrower disclosing both of the following:

(1) Any documentation or forms that the mortgage servicer requires the borrower to furnish or complete to be considered for an additional period of forbearance.

(2) A description
 of the deadlines and timelines associated with considering the borrower for an additional period of forbearance.

(i) A mortgage servicer shall report the credit obligations of borrowers under a disaster-related forbearance plan in compliance with the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.). For accounts granted disaster-related mortgage payment relief pursuant to this title, a mortgage servicer shall not furnish information during the forbearance period indicating that the payments are in forbearance and shall do either of the following:

(1) Report the credit obligation or account as current.

(2) If a borrower was delinquent before the disaster-related forbearance plan, the mortgage servicer
 shall:

(A) Maintain the delinquent status during the period in which the plan is in effect.

(B) If the consumer brings the account current during the forbearance period, report the account as current.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 238)   Effective September 22, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.24.

(a) A mortgage servicer shall disclose to a borrower to whom a forbearance has been granted pursuant to Section 3273.23 that the forborne mortgage payments are required to be repaid.

(b) The disclosure required by subdivision (a) is only required to be furnished to the borrower once at the beginning of the forbearance period.

(c) A lump sum payment shall not be required for a borrower who was current on the residential mortgage loan when the borrower entered forbearance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 238)   Effective September 22, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.25.

During the time of forbearance granted pursuant to this title, a mortgage servicer shall not initiate any judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure process, move for a foreclosure judgment or order of sale, or execute a foreclosure-related eviction or foreclosure sale if the borrower is performing pursuant to the terms of the forbearance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 238)   Effective September 22, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.26.

Failure to comply with this title shall not affect the validity of a trustee’s sale or a sale to a bona fide purchaser for value.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 238)   Effective September 22, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.27.

(a) (1) With respect to a federally backed loan, a person shall not be held liable for a violation of this title if compliance with this title conflicts with the servicing guidelines applicable to the federally backed loan.

(2) Servicing guidelines applicable to a federally backed loan includes servicing guidelines like those issued by the Federal National Mortgage Association (Fannie Mae) and the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation (Freddie Mac), the Single Family Housing Policy Handbook issued by the Federal Housing Administration of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, the VA Servicer Handbook issued by the United
 States Department of Veterans Affairs, or a servicing handbook issued by the Rural Development division of the United States Department of Agriculture, as those guidelines existed on January 13, 2025.

(b) With respect to a residential mortgage loan that is not a federally backed loan, a person shall not be held liable for a violation of this title if compliance with this title conflicts with the servicing guidelines issued by Fannie Mae or Freddie Mac.

(c) For purposes of this section, “conflicts with” means that it is impossible to comply with this title and the person’s obligation under the applicable servicing guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 238)   Effective September 22, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.28.

The Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall post all of the following on its website:

(a) Links to the provisions of servicing guidelines pertaining to disaster-related forbearance relief for federally backed loans.

(b) A summary of Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac guidance to assist borrowers in understanding their forbearance programs.

(c) A dedicated telephone number for borrowers seeking assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 238)   Effective September 22, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.29.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that a mortgage servicer offer a borrower forbearance that is consistent with the mortgage servicer’s contractual or other authority. Nothing in this title requires a mortgage servicer to take any action that would require the mortgage servicer to breach the terms of an existing contract with the investor that owns or insures the residential mortgage loan.

(b) It is the intent that this title not apply to servicing guidelines that are unrelated to disaster-related forbearance relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 238)   Effective September 22, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.30.

The provisions of this title are severable. If any provision of this title or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 238)   Effective September 22, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 20. Firearm Industry Responsibility Act [3273.50. - 3273.55.]

3273.50.

As used in this title, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Ammunition” has the same meaning as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 16150 of the Penal Code.

(b) “Firearm” has the same meaning as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16520 of the Penal Code.

(c) “Firearm accessory” means an attachment or device designed or adapted to be inserted into, affixed onto, or used in conjunction with a firearm that is designed, intended, or functions to
 increase a firearm’s rate of fire or to increase the speed at which a person may reload a firearm or replace the magazine, or any other attachment or device described in subdivision (a) of Section 30515 of the Penal Code that may render a firearm an assault weapon when inserted into, affixed onto, or used in conjunction with a firearm. The term firearm accessory also includes any other device, tool, kit, part, or parts set that is clearly designed and intended for use in manufacturing firearms.

(d) “Firearm-related product” means a firearm, ammunition, a firearm precursor part, a firearm component, firearm manufacturing machine, and a firearm accessory that meets any of the following conditions:

(1) The item is sold, made, or distributed in California.

(2) The item is
 intended to be sold or distributed in California.

(3) The item is or was possessed in California and it was reasonably foreseeable that the item would be possessed in California.

(e) “Firearm precursor part” has the same meaning as provided in Section 16531 of the Penal Code.

(f) “Firearm industry member” shall mean a person, firm, corporation, company, partnership, society, joint stock company, or any other entity or association engaged in the manufacture, distribution, importation, marketing, wholesale sale, or retail sale of firearm-related products.

(g) “Firearm manufacturing machine” means a three-dimensional printer, as defined in Section 29185 of the Penal Code,
 a computer numerical control (CNC) milling machine, or a similar machine, that is marketed or sold as or is reasonably designed or intended to be used to manufacture or produce firearms, firearm components, or firearm accessories.

(h) “Reasonable controls” means reasonable procedures, acts, or practices that are designed, implemented, and enforced to do the following:

(1) Prevent the sale or distribution of a firearm-related product to a straw purchaser, a firearm trafficker, a person prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or federal law, or a person who the firearm industry member has reasonable cause to believe is at substantial risk of using a firearm-related product to harm themselves or another or of possessing or using a firearm-related product unlawfully.

(2) Prevent the loss or theft of a firearm-related product from the firearm industry member.

(3) Ensure that the firearm industry member complies with all provisions of California and federal law and does not otherwise promote the unlawful manufacture, sale, possession, marketing, or use of a firearm-related product.

(4) Prevent the installation and use of a pistol converter, as defined in Section 17015 of the Penal Code, with a firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 636, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.51.

(a) A firearm industry member shall comply with the firearm industry standard of conduct. It shall be a violation of the firearm industry standard of conduct for a firearm industry member to fail to comply with any requirement of this section.

(b) A firearm industry member shall do both of the following:

(1) Establish, implement, and enforce reasonable controls.

(2) Take reasonable precautions to ensure that the firearm industry member does not sell, distribute, or provide a firearm-related product to a downstream distributor or retailer of firearm-related products
 who fails to establish, implement, and enforce reasonable controls.

(c) A firearm industry member shall not manufacture, market, import, offer for wholesale sale, or offer for retail sale a firearm-related product that is abnormally dangerous and likely to create an unreasonable risk of harm to public health and safety in California. For the purposes of this subdivision, the following shall apply:

(1) A firearm-related product shall not be considered abnormally dangerous and likely to create an unreasonable risk of harm to public health and safety based on a firearm’s inherent capacity to cause injury or lethal harm.

(2) There shall be a presumption that a firearm-related product is abnormally dangerous and
 likely to create an unreasonable risk of harm to public health and safety if any of the following is true:

(A) The firearm-related product’s features render the product most suitable for assaultive purposes instead of lawful self-defense, hunting, or other legitimate sport and recreational activities.

(B) The firearm-related product is designed, sold, or marketed in a manner that foreseeably promotes conversion of legal firearm-related products into illegal firearm-related products.

(C) The firearm-related product is designed, sold, or marketed in a manner that is targeted at individuals who are legally prohibited from accessing firearms.

(d) A firearm industry member shall
 not engage in any conduct related to the sale or marketing of firearm-related products that is in violation of the following sections:

(1) Paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), or (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 1770.

(2) Section 17200 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) Section 17500 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) Section 17508 of the Business and Professions Code.

(e) (1) Prior to completing the sale or delivery in California or to a California resident of a firearm accessory or a firearm manufacturing machine, as those terms are defined in Section 3273.50,
 or of a firearm barrel unattached to a firearm, a firearm industry member shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(A) The firearm industry member shall provide a prospective purchaser with a clear and conspicuous notice of the information provided in paragraph (2).

(B) The firearm industry member shall receive an acknowledgment from the prospective purchaser attesting that the prospective purchaser received and understands the notice provided in paragraph (2).

(C) The firearm industry member shall require the prospective purchaser to provide proof of age and identity verifying that the prospective purchaser is at least 18 years of age.

(2) The notice described in paragraph (1) shall clearly notify the prospective purchaser that it is generally a crime in California to engage in any of the following conduct without a valid license to manufacture firearms:

(A) Manufacturing more than three firearms per calendar year in California.

(B) Manufacturing a firearm using a three-dimensional printer or CNC milling machine.

(C) Manufacturing a firearm for the purpose of selling or transferring ownership of that firearm to another individual who is not licensed to manufacture firearms.

(D) Manufacturing a firearm for the purpose of selling, loaning, or transferring that firearm, with the
 intent to complete the sale, loan, or transfer without a required background check initiated by a licensed firearms dealer.

(E) Allowing, facilitating, aiding, or abetting the manufacture of a firearm by a person who is legally prohibited from possessing firearms.

(F) Manufacturing, or causing the manufacture of, assault weapons, machineguns, undetectable firearms, unserialized firearms, unsafe handguns that are not on the Department of Justice roster of handguns certified for sale in California, or other generally prohibited weapons.

(3) For shipment and delivery of a firearm barrel, firearm accessory, or firearm manufacturing machine, the firearm industry member shall do all of the following:

(A) Ensure all packages are conspicuously labeled with the words: “Signature and proof of identification of person aged 18 years or older required for delivery.”

(B) Ensure the shipping instructions list an address that matches the purchaser’s identification.

(C) Require the purchaser, upon delivery, to present a courier with proof of identification and the purchaser’s signature in order to receive the item.

(4) This subdivision does not apply to the sale or delivery of a firearm barrel, firearm accessory, or firearm manufacturing machine to any of the following:

(A) A federally licensed firearms
 dealer, manufacturer, or importer.

(B) A licensed ammunition vendor.

(C) A member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard, while on duty and acting within the scope and course of employment, or any law enforcement agency or law enforcement officer while on duty and acting within the scope and course of employment.

(D) A forensic laboratory.

(E) A wholesaler.

(5) This subdivision does not apply to the delivery of a firearm barrel, firearm accessory, or firearm manufacturing machine to a licensed common carrier or an authorized agent or employee of a licensed common
 carrier, when acting in the course and scope of duties incident to the delivery of or receipt of these items.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 636, Sec. 2.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.52.

(a) An act or omission by a firearm industry member in violation of the firearm industry standard of conduct set forth in Section 3273.51 shall be actionable under this section.

(b) A person who has suffered harm in California because of a firearm industry member’s conduct described by subdivision (a) may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) (1) The Attorney General may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California to enforce this title and remedy harm caused by a violation of this title.

(2) A city attorney
 may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of that city to enforce this title and remedy harm caused by a violation of this title.

(3) A county counsel may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of that county to enforce this title and remedy harm caused by a violation of this title.

(d) If a court determines that a firearm industry member engaged in conduct described by subdivision (a), the court may award any or all of the following:

(1) Injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the firearm industry member and any other defendant from further violating the law.

(2) Damages.

(3) Attorney’s fees and
 costs.

(4) Any other appropriate relief necessary to enforce this title and remedy the harm caused by the conduct.

(e) (1) In an action alleging that a firearm industry member failed to establish, implement, and enforce reasonable controls in violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 3273.51, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the firearm industry member failed to implement reasonable controls if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The firearm industry member’s action or failure to act created a reasonably foreseeable risk that the harm alleged by the claimant would occur.

(B) The firearm industry member could have established, implemented, and enforced reasonable controls to prevent or
 substantially mitigate the risk that the harm would occur.

(2) If the rebuttable presumption described by paragraph (1) is established, the firearm industry member has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the firearm industry member established, implemented, and enforced reasonable controls.

(f) An intervening act by a third party, including, but not limited to, criminal misuse of a firearm-related product, shall not preclude a firearm industry member from liability under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 98, Sec. 3.   (AB 1594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 3273.55.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.54.

(a) This title shall not be construed or implied to limit or impair in any way the right of a person or entity to pursue a legal action under any other authority.

(b) This title shall not be construed or implied to limit or impair in any way an obligation or requirement placed on a firearm industry member by any other authority.

(c) This title shall be construed and applied in a manner that is consistent with the requirements of the California and the United States Constitutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 98, Sec. 3.   (AB 1594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 3273.55.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.55.

This title shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 98, Sec. 3.   (AB 1594)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 21. Firearm Manufacturing [3273.60. - 3273.625.]

3273.60.

As used in this title, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Digital firearm manufacturing code” means any digital instructions in the form of computer-aided design files, computer-aided manufacturing files, or other code or instructions stored and displayed in electronic format as a digital model that may be used to program a CNC milling machine, a three-dimensional printer, or a similar machine, to manufacture or produce any of the following:

(1) A firearm, including a completed frame or receiver or a firearm precursor part.

(2) A large-capacity magazine, as defined in Section
 16740 of the Penal Code.

(3) A large-capacity magazine conversion kit, as defined in Section 32311 of the Penal Code.

(4) A machinegun, as defined in Section 16880 of the Penal Code, including devices commonly known as switches or auto-sear devices.

(5) A multiburst trigger activator, as defined in Section 16930 of the Penal Code.

(6) A silencer, as defined in Section 17210 of the Penal Code.

(7) A firearm accessory, as defined in Section 3273.50.

(8) A firearm barrel.

(b) “Federally licensed firearms manufacturer” means a person, firm, corporation, or other entity that holds a valid license to manufacture firearms issued pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Part I of Title 18 of the United States Code and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(c) “Firearm” has the same meaning as in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16520 of the Penal Code.

(d) “Three-dimensional printer” means a computer-aided manufacturing device capable of producing a three-dimensional object from a three-dimensional digital model through an additive manufacturing process that involves the layering of two-dimensional cross sections formed of a resin or similar material that are fused together to form a three-dimensional
 object.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 636, Sec. 3.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.61.

(a) A civil action may be brought against a person who knowingly does either of the following:

(1) Distributes or causes to be distributed, by any means including the internet, any digital firearm manufacturing code to any other person in this state who is not a federally licensed firearms manufacturer, member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard, while on duty and acting within the scope and course of employment, or any law enforcement agency or forensic laboratory.

(2) Commits an act that violates Section 29185 of the Penal Code, regardless of whether the act results in a conviction.

(b) (1) In awarding compensatory damages under subdivision (c), a court shall hold a person who commits an act described in subdivision (a) strictly liable for any personal injury or property damage inflicted by the use of a firearm or other device that was unlawfully manufactured or produced as a result of the person’s violation, including a firearm or device
 manufactured or produced in whole or in part using the digital firearm manufacturing code that the person distributed or caused to be distributed in violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), or a firearm or device that was unlawfully manufactured by means of a computer numerical control (CNC) milling machine, a three-dimensional printer, or a similar
 machine as a result of the person’s act in violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) This subdivision does not apply to any injury or property damage sustained by a person who commits an unlawful act described in subdivision (a).

(c) (1) A person who has suffered harm in California as a result of a violation of this section may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to establish that a person has violated this section, and may seek compensatory damages as well as injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the person and any other defendant from further violating the law.

(2) The Attorney General, county counsel, or city attorney may bring an action in any
 court of competent jurisdiction to establish that a person has violated this section and may seek a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation, as well as injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the person and any other defendant from further violating the law.

(d) A prevailing plaintiff shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(e) The remedies provided by this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting any other rights, causes of action, claims, or defenses available under any other law.

(f) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a person has violated paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of this section if both of the following are
 true:

(1) The person owns or participates in the management of an internet website or other electronic portal, database, or platform that makes digital firearm manufacturing code available for purchase, download, or other distribution to individuals in California who are not federally licensed firearms manufacturers and who are not otherwise described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) Under the totality of the circumstances, the internet website or other electronic portal, database, or platform encourages individuals who access or use the internet website or electronic portal, database, or platform to upload or disseminate digital firearm manufacturing code or to use digital firearm manufacturing code to manufacture firearms, firearm accessories, or other devices described
 in subdivision (a) of Section 3273.60.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 636, Sec. 4.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.62.

(a) A person shall not sell, offer to sell, transfer, advertise, or market a CNC milling machine or three-dimensional printer in a manner that knowingly or recklessly causes another person in this state to engage in conduct prohibited by Section 29185 of the Penal Code, or in a manner that otherwise knowingly or recklessly aids, abets, promotes, or facilitates conduct prohibited by that section.

(b) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a person is engaged in conduct in violation of subdivision (a) if both of the following are true:

(1) The person offers to sell, advertises, or markets a CNC milling
 machine or three-dimensional printer in a manner that, under the totality of the circumstances, is targeted at purchasers seeking to manufacture firearms or that otherwise affirmatively promotes the machine or printer’s utility in manufacturing firearms, regardless of whether the machine or printer is otherwise described or classified as having any other capabilities.

(2) The person sells or transfers the CNC milling machine or three-dimensional printer described in paragraph (1) without verifying that a purchaser or transferee in this state is a federally licensed firearms manufacturer or not otherwise prohibited from purchasing or using the machine or printer to manufacture firearms under Section 29185 of the Penal Code.

(c) A person who has suffered harm because of conduct in violation
 of this section, including conduct in violation of Section 29185 of the Penal Code that was precipitated by a violation of this section, may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to seek appropriate relief, which may include injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the person and any other defendant from further violating the law, compensatory or statutory damages, punitive damages, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, and any other appropriate relief necessary to enforce this title and remedy the harm caused by the violation.

(d) In the name of the people of the State of California, the Attorney General, county counsel, or city attorney
 may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to establish that a person has violated this section, or Section 29185 of the Penal Code, and seek a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation, as well as injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the person and any other defendant from further violating the law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (AB 1089)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.625.

(a) It is unlawful to knowingly, willfully, or recklessly cause another person to engage in the unlawful manufacture of firearms, or to knowingly, willfully, or recklessly aid, abet, promote, or facilitate the unlawful manufacture of firearms.

(b) As used in this section, the “unlawful manufacture of firearms” shall have the same meaning provided in subdivision (b) of Section 29186 of the Penal Code.

(c) (1) A person who has suffered harm in California as a result of a violation of this section may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to establish that a person
 has violated this section, and may seek compensatory damages as well as injunctive
 relief sufficient to prevent the person and any other defendant from further violating the law.

(2) The Attorney General, county counsel, or city attorney may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to establish that a person has violated this section, and may seek a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation, as well as injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the person and any other defendant from further violating the law.

(d) A prevailing plaintiff shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(e) The remedies provided by this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting any other rights, causes of action,
 claims, or defenses available under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 22. Child Sexual Abuse Material Hosted on a Social Media Platform [3273.65. - 3273.69.]

3273.65.

As used in this title:

(a) “Child pornography” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2256 of Title 18 of the United States Code, as amended from time to time.

(b) “Child sexual abuse material” means either of the following:

(1) Child pornography.

(2) Obscene matter that depicts a minor personally engaging in, or personally simulating, sexual conduct.

(c) “Identifiable minor” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2256 of Title 18 of the United States Code, as amended from time to time.

(d) “Minor” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2256 of Title 18 of the United States Code, as amended from time to time.

(e) “Obscene matter” has the same meaning as defined in Section 311 of the Penal Code.

(f) “Reporting user” means a natural person who reports material to a social media platform using the means provided by the social media platform pursuant to Section 3273.61.

(g) (1) “Social
 media company”
 has, except as provided in paragraph (2), the same meaning as defined in Section 22675 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) “Social media company” does not include a nonprofit organization exempt from federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(h) (1) “Social media platform” has, except as provided in paragraph (2), the same meaning as defined in Section 22675 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) “Social media platform” does not include
 either of the following:

 (A) A stand-alone direct messaging service that provides end-to-end encrypted communication or the portion of a multiservice platform that uses end-to-end encrypted communication.

(B) An internet-based service or application owned or operated by a nonprofit organization exempt from federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 579, Sec. 2.   (AB 1394)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, as prescribed by Stats. 2023, Ch. 579, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.66.

A social media platform shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide, in a mechanism that is reasonably accessible to users, a means for a user who is a California resident to report material to the social media platform that the user reasonably believes meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The reported material is child sexual abuse material.

(2) The reporting user is an identifiable minor
 depicted in the reported material.

(3) The reported material is displayed, stored, or hosted on the social media platform.

(b) Collect information reasonably sufficient to enable the social media platform to contact, pursuant to subdivision (c), a reporting user.

(c) A social media platform shall contact a reporting user in writing by a method, including, but not limited to, a telephone number for purposes of sending text messages, or an email address, that meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The method is chosen by the reporting user.

(2) The method is not a method that is within the
 control of the social media company that owns or operates the social media platform.

(d) (1) Permanently block the instance of reported material from being viewable on the social media platform if the reported material meets all of the following criteria:

(A) There is a reasonable basis to believe that the reported material is child sexual abuse material.

(B) The reported material is displayed, stored, or hosted on the social media platform.

(C) (i) The report contains basic identifying information, such as an account identifier, sufficient to permit the social media platform to locate the reported material.

(ii) A social media platform shall not require a report to contain a specific piece of information for purposes of this
 subparagraph.

(2) A social media platform shall make reasonable efforts to remove and block other instances of the same reported material blocked pursuant to this subdivision from being viewable on the social media platform.

(e) Provide written confirmation to a reporting user that the social media platform received that person’s report that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The written confirmation is provided to the reporting user within
 36 hours of when the material was first reported.

(2) The written confirmation is provided using the information collected from the reporting user under subdivision (b).

(3) The written confirmation informs the reporting user of the schedule of regular written updates that the social media platform is required to make under subdivision (f).

(f) (1) Provide a written update to the reporting user as to the status of the social media platform’s handling of the reported material using the information collected from the reporting user under subdivision (b).

(2) The written update required by this subdivision shall
 be provided seven days after the date on which the written confirmation required under subdivision (e) was provided and every seven days thereafter until the final written determination required by subdivision (g) is provided.

(g) Issue a final written determination to the reporting user, using the information collected from the reporting user under subdivision (b), stating one of the following:

(1) The reported material has been determined to be child sexual abuse material that was displayed, stored, or hosted on the social media platform and has been blocked on the social media platform.

(2) The reported material has been determined not to be child sexual abuse material.

(3) The reported material has been determined not to be displayed, stored, or hosted on the social media platform.

(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), comply with subdivisions (c) to (g), inclusive, no later than 30 days after the date on which material was first reported pursuant to this section.

(2) (A) If the social media platform cannot comply with subdivisions (c) to (g), inclusive, due to circumstances beyond the reasonable control of the social media platform, the social media platform shall comply with subdivisions (c) to (g), inclusive, no later than 60 days after the date on which material was first reported pursuant to this section.

(B) If this paragraph
 applies, the social media platform shall promptly provide written notice of the delay, no later than 48 hours from the time the social media platform knew the delay was likely to occur, to the reporting user using the information collected from the reporting user under subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 579, Sec. 2.   (AB 1394)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, as prescribed by Stats. 2023, Ch. 579, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.67.

(a) A social media company that fails to comply with the requirements of this title shall be liable to a reporting user for all of the following:

(1) Any actual damages sustained by the reporting user as a result of the violation.

(2) (A) (i) Subject to
 clauses (ii) and (iii), statutory damages of no more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per violation.

(ii) If a social media platform has permanently blocked the instance of the reported material pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3273.66 before a complaint is filed for a violation of this title, the maximum statutory damages awarded pursuant to clause (i) shall be one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) per violation.

(iii) If a social media platform meets all of the following
 requirements, the maximum statutory damages awarded pursuant to clause (i) for a violation of subdivisions (d) to (g), inclusive, of Section 3273.66 shall be seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per violation:

(I) The social media platform registers with, and participates in, the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children’s Take It Down service or its successor.

(II) The social media platform receives updated hash values for identified child sexual abuse material from the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children’s Take It Down service, or its successor, at least once every 36 hours.

(III) Within 36 hours of receiving updated hash values for identified child sexual abuse material from the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children’s Take it Down service, or its successor, pursuant to
 subclause (II), the social media platform removes child sexual abuse material identified by hash values from the social media platform.

(IV) The social media platform reports identified child sexual abuse material to the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children’s CyberTipline, as required by Section 2258A of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(V) The social media platform provides to a reporting user both of the following when a user reports child sexual abuse material to the platform directly:

(ia) Written confirmation to the reporting user that the social media platform received that person’s report within 36 hours after the child sexual abuse material was reported.

(ib) A final written determination to the reporting user within 30 days
 after the date on which the material was first reported.

(B) In determining the amount of statutory damages pursuant to this paragraph, a court shall consider the willfulness and severity of the violation and whether the social media platform has previously violated this title.

(3) Costs of the action, together with reasonable attorney’s fees, as determined by the court.

(4) Any other relief that the court deems proper.

(b) The failure of a social media platform to comply with subdivisions (c) to (g), inclusive, of Section
 3273.66 within 60 days after the date on which material was first reported pursuant to Section
 3273.66 shall establish a rebuttable presumption that the reporting user is entitled to statutory damages under this section.

(c) This title shall not be construed to limit or impair in any way a cause of action under paragraph (1) of Section 1710.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 579, Sec. 2.   (AB 1394)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, as prescribed by Stats. 2023, Ch. 579, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.68.
